Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 2 Parental Rights in Guardian Selection

29-2-3.
Guardian of minor children in event of divorce; death of spouse or former spouse.

For purposes of this Code section, the terms “joint legal custody” and “sole custody” shall have the meanings as provided in Code Section 19-9-6.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each parent shall be the natural guardian of any minor child of the parent, except that, if the parents are divorced and one parent has sole custody of the minor, that parent is the sole natural guardian of that minor. If the parents have joint legal custody, both parents are the natural guardians of that minor.

If one parent of a minor dies, the surviving parent is the sole natural guardian of the minor, even if the parents were divorced and the deceased parent had sole custody of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Parent and child relationship generally, §

19-7-1

et seq.

Circumstances justifying removal of child from parental custody, §

19-7-4

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Trusts for Dependents: Effect of Georgia’s Support Obligation on Federal Income Taxation,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 323 (1972).

29-2-4.
Nomination of testamentary guardian; no bond or security required.

Every parent, by will, may nominate a testamentary guardian for the parent’s minor child.

Unless the minor has another living parent, upon probate of the minor’s parent’s will, letters of guardianship shall be issued to the individual nominated in the will who shall serve as testamentary guardian without a hearing provided that the individual is willing to serve and no objection is filed. If a timely objection is filed, letters of guardianship shall only be issued after a hearing held pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection.

At the time such will is offered for probate, notice of the testamentary guardianship shall be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the minor child’s adult siblings and grandparents. If such child does not have adult siblings or grandparents, such notice shall be served on such child’s great-grandparents, aunts, uncles, great aunts, or great uncles, insofar as any such relative exists.

Any person who receives a notice pursuant to this subsection and objects to the appointment of the nominated testamentary guardian shall file an objection with the court within ten days of being served with notice. Such objection shall include allegations and facts with reasonable specificity stating why the nominated testamentary guardian is unfit to serve.

If a timely objection is filed, the court shall conduct an expedited hearing within 30 days of the date of the filing of the last objection. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 29-2-14. The court shall award the letters of guardianship to the nominated testamentary guardian unless the objecting party establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the nominated testamentary guardian is unfit to serve as testamentary guardian.

Any proceeding relating to the appointment of a testamentary guardian shall not affect or delay the probating of a will.

A testamentary guardian shall not be required to give bond or security. In all other respects a testamentary guardian shall have the same rights, powers, and duties as a permanent guardian appointed by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 780, § 4-1/SB 364.

Cross references.

Disability of minors with regard to disposal of property generally, §

1-2-8

.

Amount of bond required from guardian of property in probate proceedings, § 53-7-34 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).